Colorado, session 2026A, HB1365.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 25.5-5-332.
SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to implement this
act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
health care policy and financing for medical and long-term care services
for medicaid-eligible individuals is decreased by $181,514, which is
subject to the "(M)" notation as defined in the annual general
appropriation act for the same fiscal year.
(2) The decrease of the appropriation in subsection (1) of this
section is based on the assumption that the anticipated amount of federal
funds received for the 2026-27 state fiscal year by the department of
health care policy and financing for medical and long-term care services
for medicaid-eligible individuals will decrease by $181,514.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of
an appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27
state fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the
annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the
department of health care policy and financing for medical and long-term
care services for medicaid-eligible individuals is less than the amount of
the adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year does not include an appropriation to the department of health
-2- HB26-1365

care policy and financing for medical and long-term care services for
medicaid-eligible individuals.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the
annual general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever
is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- HB26-1365